Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1003
Evidence; recording and preservation; court reporters; appointment; uniform salary schedules; expenses; payment.

The Supreme Court shall provide by rule for the recording and preservation of evidence in all cases in the district and separate juvenile courts and for the preparation of transcripts and bills of exceptions. Court reporters and other persons employed to perform the duties required by such rules shall be appointed by the judge under whose direction they work. The Supreme Court shall prescribe uniform salary schedules for such employees, based on their experience and training and the methods used by them in recording and preserving evidence and preparing transcripts and bills of exceptions. Salaries and expenses of such employees shall be paid by the State of Nebraska from funds appropriated to the Supreme Court. Such employees shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1974, LB 647, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 34;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-342.02;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 18.